Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 14. Dangerous Captive Animal Exhibits.

§ 3.2-6594.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Dangerous captive animal”
means any bear, cougar, jaguar, leopard, lion, nonhuman primate, or tiger, or any hybrid of any such animal. “Dangerous captive animal” does not include a clouded leopard.

“Direct contact”
means physical contact or proximity where physical contact is possible, including an opportunity for photography without a permanent physical barrier designed to prevent physical contact between the public and a dangerous captive animal.

“Keeper”
means any person, as defined in §

1-230

, who owns, has custody of, or is in control of a dangerous captive animal.

History.

2020, c. 632.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 632, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 3.2-6595.
Direct contact with dangerous captive animals prohibited.

It is unlawful for any keeper to provide or offer to provide to any member of the public, for free or for a cost, direct contact with a dangerous captive animal.

History.

2020, c. 632.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 632, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 3.2-6596.
Violation; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and is subject to a fine of not more than $500.

History.

2020, c. 632.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 632, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”